_	He explained that after "Settlers IV" was criticised for being too similar to "Settlers III", Blue Byte made the decision that the next game should represent a "real innovation leap."
_	WRKO said in announcing the decision that the station's local news and issues would be driven by the talk show hosts, instead of the news anchors.
_	The Assembly brought the decision that "The Gulf of Kotor, according to its location, history, language and tribal majority belongs to Serbs".
_	Free the Vote NC (as the North Carolinians for Free & Proper Elections), along with other organizations, submitted an amicus curiae brief in support of the Libertarian Party of NC and NC Green Party's case against the State of North Carolina and appealing the decision that the North Carolina Court of Appeals made in favor of the State on October 20, 2009.
_	The Air Ministry made the decision that Mk VC airframes should be converted to take the more powerful engine and, as a result, many of the early IXs were converted Mk VCs which did not have any of the refinements which later appeared.
_	He told journalists "Our government has now made the decision that Americans will return to engagement at the ICC."
_	Around this time, King Hovhannes-Smbat made the decision that the lands should become an Episcopal settlement.
_	Eragon, coming to the decision that there is no safe place to raise the dragons and train new Riders in Alagaësia, begins planning to sail away with the Eldunarí and the eggs to a region far east of Alagaësia.
_	"[Q]uite apart from encouraging forum shopping, the conclusion if the Supreme Court of California's decision is upheld," responded John Wells, "the decision that Southland is asking for is the one that would encourage forum shopping."
_	Having spoken to the organisers of the demonstration, I took the decision that there will be no movement of livestock into Brightlingsea tonight.
_	Ltd appealed the decision that he was personally liable for negligent misstatement; the judges alleged failure to consider contributory negligence; and the quantum of damages.
_	The graphics were chosen, similarly to "Phantom Hourglass", as a result of the decision that toon shading would be best to deliver the games.
_	The D.C. Circuit and many other courts have since reaffirmed the decision that CLECs have to provide and demonstrate that they would be competitively impaired in order to gain access to any of the remaining unbundled network elements.
_	In February 2014 it was reported that senior BJP members in Kerala were opposed to the decision that K. Surendran should again be the BJP's Lok Sabha candidate for the Kasaragod constituency.
_	On February 12, 2002, U.S. Secretary of Energy Spencer Abraham made the decision that this site was suitable to be the nation's nuclear repository.
_	A series of court cases ended with the decision that the buildings nearing completion could stay, immediately to the west of that some workshops would be allowed below the level of Princes Street, and further west a park would be "kept and preserved in perpetuity as pleasure ground" in what became Princes Street Gardens.
_	A major controversy that arose during Wilson's first government was the decision that the government could not fulfill its long-held promise to raise the school leaving age to 16, because of the investment required in infrastructure, such as extra classrooms and teachers.
_	In 1986, Seelig made the decision that he could no longer hide the fact that he was gay.
_	To complicate things even more, Camila's father does not approve of the decision that she and Carlos made.
_	The Constitutional Court, following the appointment of Peter Grasso as a new national anti-Mafia prosecutor, declared illegal the decision that the judge had ruled Gian Carlo Caselli from the competition.
_	As of September 2016, Attorney Amal Clooney spoke before the United Nations Office on Drugs and Crime (UNODC) to discuss the decision that she had made in June 2016 to represent Murad as a client in legal action against ISIL commanders.
_	The landing craft had manually operated ramps which took too long to lower and the senior officer took the decision that the Marines would vault over the sides or over the ramps under covering fire from Vickers machine guns mounted on the bridges.
_	On 5 April 1954, The Libyan supreme court issued the decision that the royal order, issued on 19 January 1954, ordering the legislative council of Tripolitania to be dissolved, is cancelled.
_	Draiman explained this choice when he said, "If we agreed to edit the video...then it's assuming that we're agreeing with the decision that there's something about the video that is offensive enough or provocative enough that it's dangerous for them to play it.
_	The main reason for this finding was the decision that section one's exemption would only be confined to "transportation workers".
_	Rakotomaharo officially proposed Randriasandratriniony for the position, and he said that the decision that he would not serve a second term was an internal TIM matter.
_	It sets aside the decision that frustrates the promise made by a public authority to an applicant, thus binding the authority to fulfil its representation.
_	In 2017, Merlo was also behind the decision that CVS would limit access to opioid painkillers.
_	Copies are kept by J W E Rumboll (second son of E A (Bill) Rumboll (1910-1978), the High Wind), who made the decision that the identity of the Servants of the Bellows should be confirmed as above.
_	In 1532, at Chanforan in Angrogna, a Waldensian synod of churches in France, Calabria and Apulia took the decision that the Waldensian Church should join the Protestant Reformation which their doctrines had prefigured.
_	A key part of this plan was the decision that this new parliament would be elected by a system of proportional representation (PR).
_	A dispute over balloting in 1902 was resolved by the California Supreme Court on April 12 of that year, with the decision that Hanley's opponent, Charles E. Patterson, had won the election.
_	However, as a result of public controversy in late 1988 over claimed "golden handshakes" paid to two senior executives as a result of termination of their services, and in 1989 a fare increase with the corporation already enjoying a significant profit, the government took the decision that both the chairman and the managing director should leave upon expiry of their period of office.
_	In other words, it is entirely rational to recognize that both choices are equally good and arbitrarily (randomly) pick one instead of starving; although the decision that they are sufficiently the same is also subject to Buridan's ass.
_	TNA commentator Mike Tenay announced when Angle made his way to the ring that Management Director Jim Cornette, TNA's on-screen authority figure at the time, "made the decision that due to TNA's growing worldwide exposure, the company needed to have its own TNA title belts"; thereby not acknowledging the NWA ending their agreement with TNA and giving a storyline explanation as to why the championship was created.
_	In 2010-2011, the Academy set records for admissions inquiries, interviews and applications, thus supporting the decision that the name change would enhance institutional marketing efforts.
_	Upon the judge making the decision that Rolan was wrong in not fulfilling his obligation, he admitted to his mistake however still did not want to marry her.
_	Egypt has come to the decision that in the present circumstances it cannot sit by idly.
_	It was subsequently decided to halve this, based on the decision that the ability to destroy twenty Soviet cities would have nearly as great a deterrent effect as the ability to destroy forty.
_	With the decision to stop WPS league play in 2012, the Halsteads made the decision that the name, identity, or brand of the Independence would not be affiliated with other professional, minor league, or amateur women's soccer teams.
_	Bodrug describes the moment: “Out of that meeting (with Cyril Genik) came the decision that Seraphim could continue as Seraphim, and we would accord him due respect, but, having once established leadership over his priests, we would undertake to preach not Orthodoxy, but Evangelical Christianity.
_	There were also some freed slaves from the Caribbean, and some who had been brought by their owners to England, and freed later after the decision that Britain had no basis in common law for slavery.
_	On 15 March 2017, Federal Court Justice Debra Mortimer delivered the decision that “most but not all” of the claims were proven.
_	The Supreme Court came to the decision that the Fort Belknap reservation had reserved water rights through the 1888 agreement which created the Fort Belknap American Indian Reservation.
_	On July 2, 2013, Federal Judge J. Paul Oetken upheld the decision that Monnin must pay Donald Trump and the Miss USA pageant for direct damages caused by calling the pageant "fraudulent".
_	Soon, the Group made the decision that to be called a "national school of painters" there should be members from outside Toronto.
_	Ultimately, the defense felt that the shackling of Deck was not harmless beyond a reasonable doubt, meaning shackling made a difference in the decision that the jury made.
_	The Roman Catholic Church has been critical of the decision that led to Englaro's biological death.
_	After a visit to the UK Masato decided to move to Brighton, East Sussex to learn English and subsequently made the decision that his future lay in fashion.
_	To compare them, we have to take into account what is the decision that a potential infractor is facing.
_	At the Hostages Trial in Nuremberg (1948), the American judges reached the decision that the executions of Paramythia were "plain murders".
_	But soon came the decision that stunned Ryazanov - to shut down the film.
_	He reported his brief landing to Luftflotte 3 which came to the decision that the islands were not defended.
_	The United States Court of Appeals for the Second Circuit heard the case on May 3, 2002, and announced on April 3, 2003 the decision that Yousef and his partners were to remain incarcerated.
_	In September 2006, Chilwell governors made the decision that the college would be entirely managed and staffed by Chilwell School from September 2008.
_	MMS's regulatory decisions contributing to the 2010 oil spill included, in negligence, the decision that an acoustically controlled shut-off valve (BOP) would not be required as a last resort against underwater spills at the site, MMS's failure to suggest other "fail-safe" mechanisms after a 2004 report raised questions about the reliability of the electrical remote-control devices., and the fact that MMS gave permission to dozens of oil companies to drill in the Gulf of Mexico without first getting required permits from the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration that assess threats to endangered species and to assess the impact the drilling was likely to have on the gulf.
_	Due to the Brioni Agreement, a three-month moratorium was placed on the implementation of the decision that ended on 8 October.
_	The usual reason for an anti-boycott is to prevent a company or entity from backing down on the decision that initially caused the boycott.
_	However Mercury Records suddenly made the decision that it would be best to simply drop the group, without giving the single the chance of a release.
_	Rudolf Hentze stated that Germany arrived at the decision that Matin was a small machine, but he does not say whether research on this system was carried out at "OKH/Chi" or in KONA 5.
_	In August 2012, Apple won a smartphone patent lawsuit in the U.S. against Samsung, the world's largest maker of smartphones; however, on December 6, 2016, SCOTUS reversed the decision that awarded nearly $400 million to Apple and returned the case to Federal Circuit court to define the appropriate legal standard to define "article of manufacture" because it is not the smartphone itself but could be just the case and screen to which the design patents relate.
_	Bittaker appealed this decision, although on June 11, 1990, the U.S. Supreme Court upheld the decision that he be executed.
_	It was at this time in the mid 1960s that the Library Board made the decision that a new building was required in the post-war period and the citizens of Windsor heavily supported this idea.
_	With slavery so deeply divisive, Union leaders by 1862 reached the decision that slavery had to end in order for the Union to be restored.
_	In 1791 came the decision that St. Odile could be reopened.
_	Shawn Collins, an environmental attorney said "Someone (in Crestwood) made the decision that water, other than lake water, could be mixed in and that was an unlawful decision, in my opinion, and I would hope someone will look into who put these families in harm's way.
_	Via an official statement, Tirana stated that the club would appeal the decision that harms the club a lot.
_	Dr. Outland also served as a referee for college football games, including the 1907 Iowa State - Nebraska game in which he rendered the decision that negated an Iowa State field goal and preserved a 10-9 Nebraska victory.
_	"Although most of the actions we took were to help us focus our resources on key products, the decision that affected the future of Football Pro was significantly different."
_	I’ve come to the decision that Cynthia von Buhler's "But Who Will Bell the Cats?"
_	The success of the league title was quickly dampened by the decision that Rotherham were to be denied promotion to the Premiership as they did not fulfil the ever changing entry requirements.
_	From 1995, the airline was forced to pay much higher fees to the Norwegian Civil Aviation Administration, following the decision that all commercial plans, also those under , should pay flight fees.
_	Clark said that Donna and Ringo had made the decision that they are going to be with each other for life and that they are "going to be solid from now on".
_	When you go to Mars, you need to have made the decision that you're there permanently.
_	At the end of the season, he was offered a three-year contract, but turned it down in order to seek first-team football, saying "When I was 16, I made the decision that if I was still around at 21 and not in the first team I'd have to be professional and go and play first-team football somewhere else.
_	Bennett is celebrated for having provoked the decision that the doctrine of the Real Presence is a dogma not inconsistent with the creed of the Church of England.
_	It was also the decision that not every evaluation task will be run every year, e.g. none of the WSD tasks were included in the SemEval-2012 workshop.
_	However the part of the decision that states that any transitory presence within the jurisdiction is still sufficient for the service of a writ remains good law.
_	On October 29, Lahore High Court took the decision that quota system was illegal, as it would be unfair for girls so 2014-15 admissions would be held on open merit.
_	This eventually led to the decision that Lilballz was to be replaced by their new jungler Sarsky.
_	That request was quickly denied by Supreme Court Justice Anthony Kennedy, who had dissented from the decision that had denied ProtectMarriage.com standing.
_	Then, in May 1665, Shabbetai Zevi made the decision that would place Nathan of Gaza and himself in the public sphere forever.
_	"EastEnders" programme makers took the decision that the show was to be about "everyday life" in the inner city "today" and regarded it as a "slice of life".
_	Perea was a region where many people "came to the decision that He was the Messiah" (John 10:42 in the Living Bible translation).
_	This attitude is found in decisions by the Judiciary of England and Wales – in "Tweddle v Atkinson", Crompton and Blackburn JJ made the decision that they did because the claimant had not provided consideration, and the majority in "Dunlop Pneumatic Tyre Co Ltd v Selfridge & Co Ltd" based their judgment on a similar point.
_	In 1989 he took the decision that changed his career completely.
_	They make the decision that, in the case of a new attack by the Cumans, the army must not follow, rather, they must make a battle line formation in front of the camp.
_	It was formed in 1979 by BLL activists who were either purged from the organization or abandoned it in the late 1960s due to, among other things, their opposition to the decision that subsidies to the burakumin should be limited to the BLL members only.
_	While team owner Daniel Snyder expresses the opinion that the court decision is a victory for the team, the Executive Director of the NCAI asserts that the name remains a slur, and the decision that grants it First Amendment protection does not alter any of the arguments against its continued use.
_	Elizabeth, who felt the decision that she was female was a mistake, re-registered her birth in 1952, becoming Ewan Forbes-Sempill.
_	By mid-1941, officials in the War Office and the British Army had taken the decision that light tanks were no longer to be used by the British Army due to their inferior weapons and armour, as well as their poor performance during the conflict.
_	This led to his part in the TV series "Dr. Finlay's Casebook" and with it the decision that acting was what he wanted to concentrate on.
_	The Court would then agree on the decision that they wished to reach, along with the main points of argument they wished to use.
_	Modern opinion inclines to the decision that Spottiswood was the victim of the presbyterian hatred of Charles I.
_	Ray Shulman has commented: "There was definitely the decision that the last tour would be the last tour.
_	Oliphant made the decision that subsequently earned him the sobriquet "The diplomat who said 'No' to Saudi oil".
_	By 1873 he was let go by the Cincinnati Observatory due to funding issues and it was then that he made the decision that would change his career path.
_	The introduction of Cordite also led to the decision that the 12 pounder was capable of firing a heavier shell up to .
_	On 3 March 2009, Cambridge City Council announced the decision that a memorial of some kind would indeed be erected.
_	In that capacity he advised the British Government on the reduction in the size of the fleet under the Options for Change restructuring programme and on the deployment of Naval Support for the Gulf War in 1991: he also made the decision that members of the Women's Royal Naval Service should be allowed to serve in Royal Navy ships.
_	After four seasons, he and the club made the decision that was time for him to move abroad, so in summer 1999 he signed for the Belgian First Division club Germinal Beerschot from Antwerp, where his initial success was stopped by a terrible injury.
_	In 1970, after managing Tokusaburo Kosaka's successful campaign for a Diet seat, Yamamoto made the decision that he could best contribute to Japan's international relations by leaving Kosaka's employment and creating an independent, nongovernmental and nonpartisan policy institute.
_	Board of trustees member Don Criss, who voted in the majority, said in regards to the decision that ""There's no race involved."
_	Under Mao, the delegates to congresses were appointed; however, since 1982 the congress delegates have been elected, due to the decision that there must be more candidates than seats.
_	The Court noted in a footnote in the decision that under 28 U.S.C.
_	After being forced to withdraw from the French Open in May, the injury flared up again during the US Open and later during the Davis Cup World Group Play-offs, Murray made the decision that surgery was the best way to sort the problem out for the long-term.
_	On 15 June 1924 came the decision that as of 1 July, Schüttorf would once more be constituted as a town.
_	Yet, perhaps the decision that McNamara will be most remembered for is his leaving first baseman Bill Buckner in the game in the 10th inning rather than removing him for a defensive substitute.
_	After, widespread criticism against the IOC in regards to their decision in requesting the flag be removed,after a meeting between the IOC and Australian Olympic Committee resulted in the decision that the flag could stay.
_	At the start of the 1992-93 season the board of Eczacıbaşı SK took the decision that ended their basketball department activities on 3 August 1992 (1992 because of falling for the second time), and the team was disbanded by announcing its withdrawal from the league.
_	In 1854, he was one of the signatories of the decision that declared life president General Rafael Carrera.
_	Oregon governor Neil Goldschmidt had offered a conditional pardon for Morales after the conviction was overturned in case Oregon Attorney General Dave Frohnmayer appealed the decision that overturned the conviction.
_	In the early 1990s, NASA made the decision that instead of a centrally planned mission approach around pre-selected targets, mission ideas would compete for selection.
_	There are many different factors that go into the decision that is made in a child's best interest, which include: the child's health, environment and social interests, the relationship each parent has with the child, and the ability of each parent to address the needs of the child.
_	Their father Simon was so angry with the decision that he withdrew Liam, then aged thirteen, from the LTA programme.
_	Guiraudie and the actors came to the decision that they would be uncomfortable filming the scenes themselves.
_	This resulted in the decision that for the 1896–97 season the competition should be split into two separate county championships: Lancashire and Yorkshire.
_	Seth Schiesel of the "New York Times" proposed that the Court's decision should be a challenge to the industry to show that they can mature on the decision that video games are a form of art, questioning the industry "Will you use it as cover to pump out schlock or will you rise to the opportunity and respectability that has been afforded you?"
_	This debate resulted in the decision that girls should be included in the reform of the school system in 1843, and the following year, the "Svenska fruntimmersskolan i Åbo" was founded in Åbo, and the "Svenska fruntimmersskolan i Helsingfors" in Helsinki.
_	In my judgment, this court should not disturb the decision that Ms Bustard was a person in actual occupation of the Property.
_	The song became an "unofficial theme" for the other members of the "Grey's Anatomy" production after the episode aired, leading to the decision that the song would be used in the main promotion for the third season in the show.
_	General Sisinyak, made the decision that Monday morning to put together a taskforce to go to Europe in the early part of January 1985 to study the SHAPE project and to see how the process worked and what the results were.
_	The election simply confirmed the decision that had been made by the Provisional Confederate Congress earlier in the year.
_	The correct decision to make in a given situation is the decision that has the largest expected value.
_	Congress previously asserted it necessary for these political action groups to be withheld, but the court finalized the decision that this is unconstitutional in the majority opinion.
_	Initially scheduled for flight day 8, managers on the ground decided to move up the deployment of the solar arrays, following the decision that a focused inspection would not be required.
_	Member frustration was exacerbated by the decision that Worth1000 members not wishing to become DesignCrowd members would have to “opt out” of the migration, rather than “opt in".
_	We pleaded with the Auburn Police to help us find Misty but Commander Stocker made the decision that Misty did not fit the criteria of the Washington State Endangered Missing Persons Plan.
_	"I made the decision that it was important to do the best we could within the law, rather than stay at Harvard and not try."
_	Of the eight associate justices at the time, James Moore Wayne, John Catron, Peter Vivian Daniel, Samuel Nelson, Robert Cooper Grier and John Archibald Campbell agreed with Taney, while John McLean and Benjamin Robbins Curtis dissented; the latter was so upset by the decision that he resigned from the court.
_	The decision to discontinue the show was that of BBC2 controller Jane Root, who (based on interviews with Garden and Hardy) "allegedly accepted it was a great show, but [felt it] didn't fit ... the direction BBC2 should be headed," and is also widely credited with the decision that Garden's most well-known program, The Goodies, "would never be repeated on the BBC."
_	"We took the decision that it was better to be there to provide support to vulnerable people sleeping rough than not be able to advocate for them at these times.
_	In 1946, the system was renamed the ""Calgary Transit System"", to reflect the decision that all the streetcars routes were to be replaced with electric trolley buses.
_	Pavana must deal with her past relations with Bennett and Abrams in London and the decision that changed her life, her present troubles with coworkers at the Department who keep introducing politics to the equation, and her future: a relationship with the divorced Julian Carlisle, a development aid worker.
_	The incident subsequently brings Diego to the decision that he wants to father a child with Myra.
_	Special influences on this include several court decisions, amongst which are the decision that the "Mensur" does not violate moral code in 1951, that public display of fraternity colors can not be punished by expulsion from the university (1958, so called "Freiburg color dispute") and the forced acceptance of the last fencing fraternity in Berlin in 1968, and the formal obligation to head of state Theodor Heuss to abolish duels for honor.
_	The custom authorities appealed this decision on points of law to the Court of Cassation, which upheld the decision that a garnishment notice could not be used for customs penalties.
_	Traditionally, at common law, manslaughter was limited to certain categories of actions, but by the time the Berry case was decided in 1976 the categorical approach had been broadened to include verbal provocation, and the court notes in the decision that "no specific type of provocation is required" and "verbal provocation may be sufficient."
_	But STS-5 was the first mission to have a crew of more than two, and the commander made the decision that the ethical thing to do was to fly with the ejection seats disabled.
_	In the decision that shaped his career, Nagata volunteered and was selected for the Intelligence Support Activity in 1990, nicknamed "The Activity", an ultra secret unit conducting signal and human intelligence gathering for special mission units of the Joint Special Operations Command.
_	Although the decision in this case allowed the plaintiffs within this community to be certified as a class, and allowed them to be viewed as a unit when filing their lawsuit, and thereby reversing the decision that had been made at the trial and appellate level, the case was not reheard in the lower courts.
_	In 1962, this commission came to the decision that Strauss was not guilty of misconduct, which was criticized heavily by the FDP, partner of the CDU/CSU coalition in the government.
_	Her brother, who disliked her way of thinking, resolved that her independence had been caused by her education, and made the decision that his own daughter would be raised without any education to become a woman without will.
_	On 17 July, the USCIS reversed the decision that led to the protest.
_	They tried to find what they wanted in adjusting me here and there, and I think really what happened was surrender to that it was all new for this Dax, Jadzia Dax, this experience of the seven lifetimes, and Michael Piller made the decision that she was trying to come to terms with all of these entities, all of these memories that were inside of herself.
_	In certain situations, for example, the physician's point of view may differ from the decision that aligns most with the patient's values, judgments, and opinions.
_	The game finished 2–1, with Christian Benteke scoring a last-minute penalty, which shadowed the decision that went against Villa in the Stoke game.
_	Manager Alex Ferguson was so enraged by the decision that he refused to speak to the media after the game.
_	NBA commissioner Adam Silver stated in a press conference regarding the decision that he will try to force Sterling to sell the Clippers, which would require the consent of ¾ of the league's 29 other team owners.
_	Aftimios's discouragement over the state of his jurisdiction caused him to make the decision that is known as the death-knell for the American Orthodox Catholic Church:
_	"I knew that I was going to have to try to take care of my mom and I made the decision that school wasn't that important at the time and I was going to have to box to earn a living," he said.
_	In doing so, Commander Jeffrey Sinclair was selected and examined, which enables the discovery of a stunning revelation about humanity that prompts the decision that the war must suddenly end.
_	The court made the decision that the EPA must determine whether greenhouse gas emissions from new motor vehicles "cause or contribute to air pollution which may be reasonably be anticipated to endanger public health or welfare, or whether the science is too uncertain to make a reasoned decision" (EPA's Endangerment Finding).
_	These ministers, and others after them, wrote responses to the decision that was taken and ever since, the Protestant Reformed Churches have maintained that these "Three Points" were contrary to Scripture and the Reformed Confessions.
_	In 1978 Hastings came to the decision that as a Catholic priest he was free to marry.
_	The building was home to many lawyers and artists for most of the 20th century, until the main bulk of the building had to be evacuated in 1995 due to the decision that it was too dangerous to regularly use.
_	When the political factions addressed the Emperor of the future of Commagene, they were in line, were with the political reality of Roman rule and were prepared to live with the decision that Tiberius made.
_	He was chief counsel before the court in the decision that led to the outlawing of racial covenants.
_	However, the Appeals Court struck down the part of the decision that permitted prayer at football games.
_	The Pentagon claimed that the decision that Brownback would resign was mutual.
_	Its main specialist role has been enhanced in recent years by the decision that it should serve as the host institution for many of Copenhagen's speciality departments.
_	The court affirmed the decision that held that expenses paid by petitioner taxpayer in connection with sending his children to boarding school were family expenditures and not deductible as medical expenses.
_	In July 1861, Watkins made the decision that changed his career: he traveled to Yosemite.
_	The Olympic International Congress made on December 7, 1921 the decision that the host country would make the choice for the Monotype class.
_	Taylor seems to make the best decision at any possible moment, the decision that gets her out of a losing fight, the decision that saves the lives of her friends, the decision that wins a battle.
_	"Last October the Minister of Local Government W. T. Cosgrave and myself came deliberately to the decision that we would not recommend any settlement involving allegiance to the king of England.
_	Dr. Jon Bruschke made the decision that the negative team 'focused on the task' and awarded them the trophy and the victory.
_	Based on the decision that the CD-ROM in this case was a compilation, the Supreme Court of Canada then concluded that there was no 27(1) infringement.
_	Of the fifteen coroner's jury members who assessed Evans' murder, only one man, Williams Dishman, dissented from the decision that it had been committed by "unknown" culprits.
_	Back in the Oberliga "FSV" played a good first half of the 1997–98 season but, during the winter break, on 30 December 1997, the board of the club arrived at the decision that it was financially unable to continue.
_	His reputation from his work on surgical techniques in pulmonary tuberculosis led to the decision that he would undertake the lung surgery on King George VI in 1951.
_	Their marriage and the decision that Ray adopt Lucas caused some acrimony between the once-close Ray and Bobby, but they made amends and resumed their brotherly relationship.
_	At the very beginning of the band’s two-month hiatus starting in mid-September 2012, these debates culminated in the decision that Compact Disco will prepare and start its Autumn-Winter 2012 Tour and continue afterwards without Sándor, becoming a three-piece again.
_	Random choices are usually made by rolling dice and either using the result directly or looking it up in a table, depending on the decision that is to be made.
_	The Supreme Court upheld the decision that Proposition 1 was constitutional, and that, therefore, mandatory busing was not permissible.
_	The New Castle Career Center stepped in and made the decision that all programs would be moved to the career center in New Castle, Indiana with the exception of WKPW and the Broadcasting Program.
_	In October of that year, Musk made the decision that X.com would terminate its other Internet banking operations and focus on the PayPal money service.
_	Shawn made the decision that he and Belle had to beat Philip and Victor at their own game, by kidnapping Claire and going on the run.
_	Differing accounts exist of who made the decision that Mussolini should be summarily executed.
_	Plessy then appealed the case to the Louisiana Supreme Court, which affirmed the decision that the Louisiana law was constitutional.
_	The Embassy of Turkey in Rome acknowledged its government did not want the film screened in Italy, but said it was not involved in the decision that the film would not be shown.
_	While they were in this room, Starr came to the decision that she was ready to go all the way with Cole.
_	Lead singer Martin Smith intends pursuing the Compassionart project, the decision that triggered the split.
_	The only aspect of the decision that garnered the vote of five Justices was the ultimate conclusion that the mandatory life without parole sentence required by the Michigan law forbidding the possession of more than 650 grams of cocaine was not cruel and unusual punishment.
_	“We realize the rarity of the occasions on which a body of citizens find their sense of duty to be in conflict with the law and it is with a sense of gravity of the decision that The Society of Friends must on this occasion act contrary to the regulation and continue to issue literature on war and peace without submitting it to the censor and is thus acting in the best interests of the nation”
_	When Captain America tells Aunt May that Spider-Man "wasn't ready to be one of the Ultimates" and that the gunshot was meant for him, Aunt May scolds Captain America for making the decision that cost her the life of Peter Parker.
_	He thus made the decision that he and another railwayman would walk to the points and move them to the normal position manually, which they did.
_	Grifasi graduated from Bishop Fallon High School, a now-defunct Roman Catholic high school in Buffalo, when he made the decision that he wanted to be, not just any old actor, but a character actor.
_	Keitel and Guderian then made the decision that favoured Speidel's case and at the same time shifted the blame to Rommel.
_	Milo made the decision that a live political enemy was more dangerous than a dead one and ordered his gladiators to kill the injured Clodius.
_	When she finally made the decision that her party would participate in the committee investigation, Pelosi acknowledged: "I could have argued this either way.
_	Combined with the "purpose" of the Seventeenth Amendment - to ensure direct election - this should have led to the application of the strict scrutiny test, and the decision that the statute governing special elections was unconstitutional.
_	On December 7, 2017, while suspended, Callaway made the decision that he was going to enter the 2018 NFL Draft.
_	"The ones that I sold to Disney, they came up to the decision that they didn't really want to do those.
_	On 31 May, the Anglo-French Supreme War Council came to the decision that, if Italy joined the war, aerial attacks should commence against industrial and oil-related targets in northern Italy.
_	She expressed frustration that the Tate's decision displayed an attitude that assumed Muslims to be fanatical and intolerant, and articulated the view that the millions of "liberal, secular, and open minded" Muslims around the world were "offended by the decision that assumed we are all volatile and unlikely to understand such works."
_	In late 1924 the Douglas Hospital Committee made the decision that they would maintain the hospital at Port Douglas, but not extend or develop it any further, in anticipation of a new hospital being constructed at Mossman.
_	Although, the government in Belgrade accepted the decision that Vojvodina join to Serbia, it did not recognize the People's administration.
_	While on a train traveling from Elkhart, Indiana to New Orleans, Starlite came to the decision that he was going to pursue his passion of music as a career path.
_	Detection of defects is especially useful for new cables where the severity analysis is perhaps less important to the decision that is made.
_	The court came to the decision that only Andrzej Kłosiński's murder could be proven at first, which was helped by admission of Moruś, who initially denied any involvement before the court.
_	The Court showed that they could rise above politics and make the decision that it needed to make.
_	Randall was instrumental in introducing the method of "case study" to RIT, in further developing the co-op program at RIT, and in the decision that RIT would not grant degrees and would instead provide "short, intensive courses".
_	"After four very successful series of Total Wipeout, and one series of Winter Wipeout, the BBC has taken the decision that the next series, due to transmit later this year, will be the last."
_	In the press statement, Mikael Åkerfeldt explained the decision, saying, "Mendez, Axe and Fredrik and I came to the decision that we should find a replacement for Per right after the recordings of the new album, and this came as no surprise to Per.
_	The final report details how Kaplan was planning a military coup to install martial law in place of Precrime, leading Anderton to the decision that he has to assassinate Kaplan.
_	Despite the fact that both religious and civil authorities agreed with the decision that the stigmata were fraudulent, some did not accept Argumosa's diagnosis.
_	Blair is described as personally admiring Margaret Thatcher deeply and making the decision that she would be the first outside person he formally invited to visit him in 10 Downing Street.
_	While team owner Daniel Snyder expresses the opinion that the court decision is a victory for the team, the Executive Director of the NCAI asserts that the name remains a slur, and the decision that grants it First Amendment protection does not alter any of the arguments against its continued use.
_	The U.P.U. arrived at the decision that mail with insufficient postage should be marked with a "T" and from April 1, 1879 the amount missing would also be indicated in black.
_	Paul II approved the decision that Castillo died in hatred of the faith and beatified him on 12 October 1997.
_	After being eliminated from the competition, Luis Aragonés came to the decision that the team was not physical or tough enough to be able to out-muscle opponents, they therefore opted to start concentrating on monopolising the ball and thus started to employ the tiki-taka – a style characterised by short passing and movement, working the ball through various channels, and maintaining possession.
_	The Bríatharogam kenning "groan of a sick person" refers to a value "ch" [x], predating the decision that all five "forfeda" represent vowels.
_	Adams was succeeded by Massey Bromley who made the decision that henceforth more locomotives would be built at Stratford Works.
_	He asked for and examined the documents connected with the firing, and made the decision that Posse should get his position back.
_	However, in the one aspect of the decision that was favorable to the appellees, the Court also ruled that states could not impose a strict liability standard for defamation (i.e., plaintiffs had to be able to show fault of some kind) and that juries could not be allowed to award punitive damages, such as the $50,000 Gertz had received, absent any showing of actual malice, since juries could use that power to punish unpopular opinions.
_	However, no such case will have a suspensive effect on the decision that is being disputed.
_	An aspect of the decision that attracted comparatively little attention was the Court's disposition of the issues of standing and mootness.
_	This can lead to "the narrative fallacy", a mistake that leads both case teachers and the developers of case materials to ignore information that, while important to the decision that students will be asked to make, complicates the telling of the story.
_	Voah describes how he-and-Rero made the decision that he would take Ryerson's body back to Southern Cross and how he had helped Maclaren by finding and marking the resonances that led to Arvelan mattercasters.
_	Seeing countries destroyed in post-war Europe had a profound impact on him, leading to the decision that he would study Economics: he enrolled in a doctorate program at the University of Paris (Sorbonne), in 1946, and presented a thesis on the economy of Brazil during the colonial period.
_	Minister Dupuis said that the inquest was designed to "reassure the population about the merits of the decision that was taken by the Crown prosecutor."
_	McClellan appeared on "Ellen" as well shortly after the controversy and addressed the decision by saying that "the similarities of the two pieces are quite compelling," also adding that he agrees to the decision that has been made and "recognize[s]
_	Following consultation, Warwickshire County Council reached the decision that this area should be known as Hawkesbury Village.
_	Knut Ljunglöf was engaged in the decision that formed the city of Stockholm and during a number of years he was a member of the city council.
_	The trial concluded with the decision that judicial proceedings would be adjourned to August 15.
_	On March 24, 1980, six men on the campus of Prairie View A&M University made the decision that to organize a fully functional fraternity with an independently sovereign government.
_	These feminists always try to paint the marriage as legalized prostitution and heterosexual intercourse as rape; and they come to the decision that men are the enemy; families are prisons.
_	In May 1970, the Cricket Council made the decision that there should be no further tours to and from South Africa until cricket within the country was played on a multi-racial basis, and the national team was selected purely on merit.
_	Of Triple H's WWE World Heavyweight Championship win in the Rumble match, Hart said: "I didn't like the decision that Triple H, surprise, put the belt on himself again... it just showed a real lack of imagination if you ask me".
_	The split happens in friendly manner and with mutual respect for the decision that he has made.
_	Usually Burmese women have the freedom to choose their own husband, despite the continued presence of matchmaking traditions and parental say in the decision that occasionally still occur.
_	After the decision that the old bridge of Hisingen would be replaced, the choice was between a new bridge or a tunnel.
_	Delays led to the decision that the approach to the film was not as good as other extant films, and the footage and unread script were shelved.
_	Competing riders and teams supported the decision that the race organisers made in relation to the stage.
_	Following the decision that all MEPs should be elected by some form of proportional representation, the Labour government passed the European Parliamentary Elections Act 1999, creating the current eleven constituencies on Great Britain, which were first used in 1999.
_	He died in a Martinez, California convalescent hospital on the day that the U.S. court clerk released the text of the decision that set the seal on McMurtry's efforts to reestablish O.T.O.
_	Once any steps are taken to justify the decision that the accused is guilty, it becomes very difficult for the official to accept disconfirming evidence, and this can continue during appeals, retrials or any other effort to revisit a verdict.
_	He would remain with the club until the end of the 1990 NBL season before making the decision that if he wanted to further his game he would need a change of scenery.
_	The court ruled on 6 July 2017 dismissing the appeal and upholding the decision that the conservation status could not be revoked under the scheme.
_	In light of this, the PES Congress of Prague of December 2009 made the decision that PES would designate its own candidate before the 2014 European elections.
_	Detective Superintendent Shatford defended the decision that was taken to wait until the gang had reached the diamonds before arresting them.
_	ABC had taken the decision that no multi track tape recordings would be allowed, so no remixing of the Philadelphia show was possible.
_	In 2012, the decision was appealed to the British Columbia Court of Appeal, where the court upheld the decision that the Tsilhqot'in did not hold title to these lands, except for limited situations.
_	On August 30, 2012, after careful consideration over the course of many months, former Scout Executive Charles Rosser (1954-2014) announced the decision that combining the council’s five Order of the Arrow lodges into a single lodge will allow the OA to better fulfill the Mission of the Lodge and the Purpose of the Order of the Arrow.
_	Usually I tend to do everything on a record, and this time I just made the decision that they are in charge of the new material.""
_	In a statement explaining the change, CVS President & CEO Larry J. Merlo said, "We came to the decision that cigarettes and providing health care just don't go together in the same setting."
_	The judge in the case named the instigator of the violence as William "Jock" Ross, the "supreme commander" of the Comancheros, saying "Ross was primarily responsible for the decision that members of his club go to Milperra in force and armed".
_	The kids come to the decision that the only way of making it is to stay and show the world what they're made of.
_	In 1939 he made the decision that if there was going to be a war, he wanted to be a fighter pilot, and so immediately joined the Royal Air Force Volunteer Reserve as Aircraftsman Class 2 (AC2) Airman u/t Pilot (No. 745051) on 17 February 1939, and was promoted to Sergeant the following day.
_	However, she declines, having come to the decision that her place is serving as brigade commander in Iraq.
_	However the high cost and perceived vulnerability of the B-70 against the projected performance of Soviet air defenses, combined with the 1960 U-2 incident in which a high-flying spyplane had been shot down, led to the decision that intercontinental ballistic missiles would, in the future, be the primary nuclear delivery force of the United States, and therefore the B-70 project was cancelled in early 1961.
_	Promulgation is the act by which the legislator manifests to those subject to his jurisdiction the decision that he has made and makes known to them his intention to bind them to the observance of his law.
_	The largest such unit was the newly formed 1st Airborne Division, and on 19 January 1942 the War Office took the decision that a light tank detachment would be amongst the support units attached to the division.
_	The "Authorized History of MI5" confirms however that the decision that the head of that service should succeed Sir John at his planned retirement date in 1956 had been taken by the Prime Minister in 1954.
_	I have always been the type of individual that takes all the information and then makes the decision that's appropriate for me.
_	Defert explained the decision that after the material became available to researchers with the credentials to acquire a reader card at the national library, Defert and others close to Foucault felt that access should be either available "to everyone or no one".
_	After a few months of reading, she was replaced by Idina Menzel, a decision that left Block devastated, but accepting of the decision that had been made to cast a more experienced performer in the role.
_	Hodgson said about the decision that "When it came to bringing another player in, I wasn't going to bring in a player of Rio's age, class, background and experience to be a cover player.
_	The other significant outcome of the decision that declarations of inconsistency are within the jurisdiction of the courts is that it acts as a powerful check on parliamentary sovereignty.
_	On June 30, 2015, the European Court of Human Rights made the decision that the conviction of Peruzzi by the Genoa Court was not disproportionate and that his Article 10 rights to freedom of expression were not violated.
_	In June 2012, the district of Calw took the decision that only a shuttle service to the S-Bahn would run from Calw to Weil der Stadt to Renningen under the name of "Hermann-Hesse-Bahn".
_	At the time, Adrenaline Vault reported claims from an anonymous source involved with the decision that "Mortyr" was dropped because of its "history of development problems it has not wholly overcome."
_	The evicted Serbs from Transylvania became dissatisfied with the government after the decision that Temišvarac, who had commanded the Serbs during war-time, was prohibited to issue orders during peace-time to judges, councilors and other Serbs.
_	Former high-profile CEO and Managing Director Laura McBain is widely credited as recognising the potential for Bellamy’s in the Chinese organic import bonanza, making the decision that turned the company into a major Chinese food brand.
_	The senior officers made the decision that military bearing, structure, and rules would be followed.
_	The construction of the new terminal and expansion of the runway was finally decided in 2003–2004, years after making the decision that the current infrastructure was not sufficient to cover the city's needs, but that it was not yet commercially viable to build an entirely new airport in the Daular area.
_	Prelević arrived drunk to the performance leading to an argument with Kovač that ended in the decision that he should leave the band.
_	In July 2011, Coleman attempted to reverse the decision that had been made in her absence, saying, "Dad will continue to provide leadership for this ministry through me for as long as possible", and, "I have and will continue to defer to his wisdom and honor him for his unprecedented accomplishments".
_	Tierkel’s grandfather, Fischel Tierkel, made the decision that the continued violence against the Jews in the Ukraine was not sustainable for raising his family.
_	Tito, harassed and harried through the woods, reached the decision that he needed to leave and establish his headquarters in a place of security.
_	Later the same year, when the peace between Portugal and Spain was signed, Peter’s niece, Maria de Guadalupe of Lencastre, sister and heir of the 4th Duke, requested the cancellation of the decision that granted the Dukedom of Aveiro to her uncle, in order to obtain it for herself.
_	In 1969 Helsinki city council made the decision that in the future tramlines would be confined to the inner city, while the metro would serve the suburban areas; the tram system would be terminated, at earliest in the year 2000.
_	He had been the Rector of Saint Lawrence College prior to the decision that it serve exclusively Capuchin candidates.
_	By then, Bedaux had come to the decision that the expedition had to become more newsworthy than it already was and he fired his radio operator and announced that the party would continue without a radio.
_	He says, "Judicial activism is the label for the decision that people don't like."
_	In that capacity he advised the British Government on the reduction in the size of the fleet under the Options for Change restructuring programme and on the deployment of Naval Support for the Gulf War in 1991: he also made the decision that members of the Women's Royal Naval Service should be allowed to serve in Royal Navy ships.
_	The court will not interfere with the decision that the ASP is to be exonerated.
_	In December 1944, the Joint Chiefs of Staff made the decision that Operation Matterhorn would be phased out, and the B-29s would be moved to newly captured bases in the Marianas in the central Pacific.
_	The next year, H. A. Tedder, who was the Orlando executive manager at long-time lessee Florida State Theaters, made the decision that The Beacham Theatre would cease operating as a first-run movie cinema.
_	His mother was a mundane, leading to the decision that his father made of leaving the Clave and the Shadow World for his love of her.
_	The next day, the Israeli government, apparently in response to bombings two days earlier, released a statement, announcing the decision that President Arafat would be "removed" Qurei decided upon that to form a full government rather than a trimmed one.
_	However, the new board did not have the power to unilaterally stop the move to Sydney: under the VFL constitution, to rescind the decision that had been made on 29 July required a three-quarters majority in a vote of all twelve clubs, and at a meeting on 14 October it failed to obtain this majority.
_	After the incident authorities of the DBE took the decision that marked him as the fight's instigator and Milan has been suspended for game 5.
_	Fedorovych, uncertain of the decision that would have been reached, was in over his head with the "compromising" faction of Cossack leadership.
_	Clasie explained the decision that he was keen on developing himself as a player within the team as well as developing together with the team as a whole.
_	Witnessing Mayberry's performance, Doherty was "quite emotional", and they made the decision that the track would close the album.
_	This continued until 1984, when the Health Authority made the decision that it was inappropriate for it to be running a farm.
_	Earlier he was editor of "The Light Car": "Mine was the decision that caused a letter to be published in "The Light Car" suggesting the formation of an M.G. Car Club, and its inaugural meeting at the "Roebuck," Broadwater, was held within a couple of miles of my house."
_	The hearing concluded on 13 August, with the decision that he be denied bail.
_	The Committee of Imperial Defence, when establishing the post of General Officer Commanding-in-Chief Middle East Command, made the decision that all three services should be responsible for the defence of the eastern Mediterranean and Middle East.
_	Bomber's joins "Hammersley" in the rank of Able Seaman and as she grows more confident she looks into the option of maybe going for promotion to Leading Seaman, but a series of unfortunate events get in her way, firstly causing her to question whether she sees any future in the Navy at all, and ending with the romance with 2-Dads causing her to finally reach the decision that the Navy is not the career she wants after all.
_	DTPA denied the allegations and responded to the decision that the District is making retaliatory inquiries and accusations that have nothing to do with student progress.
_	In July 2013, the New Jersey Superior Court, Appellate Division affirmed the decision that Booker did not have the authority to vote to nominate Speight; a special election to fill the vacant seat was to be held in November 2013, with the council left in a four-four deadlock on the nine-member council until the seat would be filled.
_	"After much thought and consideration, I have come to the decision that it's time to hang up the grips, put away the stinky gym shoes, remove the singlet, take my hands out of the chalk bucket and start embarking on new journeys," Shewfelt wrote.
_	Having observed that "the purpose of the certificate is to assist this Court in the decision that it has to make as to whether or not leave to appeal should be granted," Chaskalson held that, where the relevant constitutional issues had been fully traversed in the judgment in respect of which the certificate had been given, there might be no need for a detailed judgment on the certificate.
_	The story is about a 17-year-old boy who becomes a drug dealer, the decision that draws him into turbulent events he can't control.
_	He single-handedly made the decision that instead of producing an "Airman" clone, as originally decided by Franklin, he would design an entirely different kind of automobile.
_	Captain Walker of "Ghost-1" makes the decision that they cannot flee, since doing so would lead the Decepticons straight to Earth.
_	Fedorovych, uncertain of the decision that would be reached, over his head, by the "compromising" faction of Cossack leadership, left Pereiaslav along with other Cossacks dissatisfied with the agreement and headed for the Cossack stronghold of the Zaporizhian Sich.
_	Salazar stated in a conference call announcing the decision that "The single greatest threat to the polar bear is the melting of Arctic Sea ice due to climate change," but the Endangered Species Act "is not the appropriate tool for us to deal with what is a global issue."
_	Success depended on enough provisions being transferred from West camp to ' ("mid-ice") for two men to winter there, and this was a factor in the decision that led to his death.
_	The Northern Lighthouse Board Engineer investigated and made the decision that a light at the entrance of Lochryan in Galloway and also one on the Point of Ayre in the Isle of Man, would be the most beneficial.
_	In January 2018, Rachel Brosnahan stated she regretted working on the series, stating; "Honestly, it's the decision that I have made in my life that is the most inconsistent with everything I stand for and believe in, both publicly and privately.
_	Maudling came to the decision that his responsibility for the Metropolitan Police, which was beginning fraud investigations into Poulson, made his position as Home Secretary untenable.
_	Later that year, John Larkin also arrived at the decision that the time had come for a new career direction which, in his case, meant Hollywood.
_	The Commissioner Abbas Ali Baig takes the decision that he won't betray the country he lives in no matter what.
_	The debate ended under the decision that a system of banking was advantageous.
_	When the peace between Portugal and Spain was signed, Maria de Guadalupe of Lencastre requested the cancellation of the decision that granted the Duchy of Aveiro to her uncle, in order to obtain it for herself.
_	Since 1991 Nordic — Office of Architecture has been involved in the design and planning of Oslo Airport, following the decision that the main airport would move to Gardermoen from its previous location at Fornebu.
_	In an interview he explained the decision that whey played only old songs, and there are only so many of them, especially good ones, not enough to produce albums every year..
_	These schools were criticized for its shallow education of accomplishments, which resulted in the decision that girls should be included in the school reform of 1843, and the following year, two Swedish-language state schools for girls was founded in Turku and Helsinki, "Svenska fruntimmersskolan i Åbo" and "Svenska fruntimmersskolan i Helsingfors".
_	Being a frequent guest on and admirer of the award-winning podcast "Never Not Funny" with Jimmy Pardo led Aukerman to the decision that he should start his own comedy podcast.
_	Joaquim Barbosa, president of the Council of Justice and the highest court of constitutional law in Brazil - the Supreme Federal Court - said in the decision that notaries cannot continue to refuse to "perform a civil wedding or the conversion of a stable civil union into a marriage between persons of the same sex."
_	These were "expected" to break through a thin screen of anti-tank guns, hence the decision that the main anti-tank units—the Tank Destroyer (TD) battalions—should be concentrated and very mobile.
_	While Danielle showed an aptitude for the guitar at a young age, Moti made the decision that Este would be more suited to the bass, buying her a second hand Fender for $50.
_	Members of the Socialist League and their rivals the SDF simply continued to speak and to incur fines, attracting public attention, until the authorities made the decision that their prosecution was counterproductive and stopped their interference.
_	The opponents eventually sued again in 1969, which led to the decision that the vote had to take place before 30 June 1970.
_	Joaquim Barbosa, president of the Council of Justice and the Supreme Federal Court, said in the decision that notaries cannot continue to refuse to "perform a civil wedding or the conversion of a stable civil union into a marriage between persons of the same sex."
_	Nonetheless, it is only where the lack of evidence significantly affects the outcome of the decision that the court is willing to exercise its power of judicial review and intervene on this ground.
_	The Washington Supreme Court upheld the decision that December.
_	Consequently, although six airframes past the prototype were under construction, only three had been completed when Tips made the decision that the aircraft was simply not commercially viable and sold the remaining airframes "as is".
_	Due to the short timescales, the decision that the ship was not "a high-value unit", and a controversy over whether arming auxiliaries was legal, "Atlantic Conveyor" was not fitted with either an active or a passive defence system.
_	During the planning process for the European Football Cup, ConIFA took the decision that, in addition to finding its first European champions, the competition would also serve as a qualification tournament for the 2016 World Football Cup, with the top three teams gaining automatic entry into the WFC.
_	""After nearly six years, and nearly 600 gigs, we've come to the decision that it's the right time to call it a day.""
_	Under Sections 1(5) and 1(6), the High Court may ask for additional reasons as to why the arbitrator reached the decision that he did, but only if one of the parties gave notice to the arbitrator that reasons would be required, or there was "some special reason why such a notice was not given".
_	Octavius was removed from office, the Plebeian tribunes came together and reached the decision that the veto of Tiberius' programmes of land reform should be nulled.
_	In an interview for "Rolling Stone" in May 2011, Thornton told music journalist, Andrew McMillen, that the band's manager at the time "couldn't be fucked fighting the label for anything that we wanted, and he'd made the decision that we were just going to go with whatever the label reckoned.
_	Joaquim Barbosa, then president of the Council of Justice and the Supreme Federal Court, said in the decision that notaries cannot continue to refuse to "perform a civil wedding or the conversion of a stable civil union into a marriage between persons of the same sex."
_	In the late 1950s, county officials came to the decision that a new jail was needed; a contract for the construction of such a structure was signed in early 1957, and the new jail opened in January 1959.
_	"We came to the decision that since we're Americans, there's no reason we have to play all Irish material.
_	"But underlying it is a huge hole in his heart and it makes it possible for the decision that they make in the final episode.
_	Of this, Fish said "I guess she just realises how much she loves him and makes the decision that she's ready to take their relationship to the next level."
_	If no tactical or territorial advantage is gained, the referee will whistle and give the decision that had been delayed.
_	She noted that she along with four others on the court effectively added language to the decision that would preempt any future laws that attempted to restrict game sales.
_	Joaquim Barbosa, president of the Council of Justice and the Supreme Federal Court said in the decision that notaries cannot continue to refuse to "perform a civil wedding or the conversion of a stable civil union into a marriage between persons of the same-sex."
_	Crema sought a court injunction requesting the cancellation of the decision that annulled the eleven Brazilian National Championship matches, Minister Nancy Andrighi of the Second Section of the Supreme Court of Justice rejected the demand.
_	The visit resulted in the decision that St Michael Benedictine Hermitage should be developed as a pre-foundation of the Congregation.
_	Following the defeat of the Party of European Socialists during the European elections of June 2009, the PES made the decision that PES would designate its candidate for Commission president in December 2009, which rapidly triggered debates about how to select this candidate.
_	The PES Congress gathering in Brussels in November 2011 made the decision that it would select the PES candidate through internal primaries in each of its member parties and organisations.
_	Producer Darryl F. Zanuck had a strong influence over the movie and made several key decisions, including the idea of having the character of Huw narrate the film in voice-over (then a novel concept), and the decision that Huw's character should not age (Tyrone Power was originally slated to play the adult Huw).
_	Mandakhnaran's coach and trainer were so incensed by the decision that they stripped in front of the judges, and leading to another point awarded to Navruzov for a final score of 7-8.
_	As one of the Commissioners, Cole was instrumental in the decision that the £186,000 surplus from the Great Exhibition would be used for improving science and art education in the United Kingdom.
_	John was quoted as saying, "we were kind of coming to the decision that we were going to let go of all of this music, and we were going to let go of songs that we had been working on for months and months.
_	From 1969 to Feb 1971 it was known as the 10R, but along with a removal of the tensioner gear in the interest of quieter operation, it was renamed the 8R-G to reflect the decision that twin-cam engines were henceforth to be identified by a "-G" suffix.
_	Promulgation is the act by which the legislator manifests to those subject to his jurisdiction the decision that he has made and makes known to them his intention to bind them to the observance of his law.
_	Mettoy had taken the decision that merely competing against their rivals with high performing low friction models was not enough.
_	"I have come to the decision that the right thing to do is to reject the honorary membership of the Düsseldorf Academy of Medicine. …
_	Justice Stevens, joined by Justices Ginsburg and Sotomayor wrote a separate opinion stating that Virginia's rush to set an execution date ""highlights once again the perversity of executing inmates before their appeals process has been fully concluded,"" while noting that they concurred with the decision that the appeal ought not be heard.
_	Moreover, further failed legal action meant Ashley was required to pay the legal costs of the SFA and Dave King following a failed bid to overturn the decision that King was a "fit and proper" person from April 2016.
_	The banks appealed against the decision that allowed the case to be heard and, with a different judge, won their appeal.
_	They hold absolute authority over the team and team members are expected to obey and comply with the decision that is made by the leader.
_	After the decision that the NFWA would support the AWOC strike, Lopez- De La Cruz and other NFWA members started picketing stores and growers.
_	Today, the ruling doctrine of the true premise of the decision that the basic reproduction photography was protected, but no longer.
_	The basic concept of individual soul liberty, is that in matters of religion, each person has the liberty to choose what conscience or soul dictates is right and is responsible to no one but God for the decision that is made.
_	Although two trials of street level trains were run, the state of Adelaide's streets, with mud in winter and dust in summer, led to the decision that they would not be reliable.
_	Maloney was so outraged by the decision that he stated he would be filing the strongest possible protest with both the British Boxing Board of Control and the Irish Boxing Board of Control as a result of the decision.
_	They made the decision that regardless of the results, they would contest for parliamentary seats to stop what was seen as an NDC monopoly in Parliament.
_	McBain is widely credited as recognising the potential for Bellamy’s in the nascent Chinese organic infant food and formula market, making the decision that turned the company into a major Chinese food brand.
_	Following that, the NPCSC made the decision that provides:
_	In a 31 May 1986 article, it criticised the decision that the 1988 Olympics were to be held in South Korea, purporting that "If the Olympic Games were to be held in South Korea, many sportsmen and tourists of the world would meet death, infected with AIDS."
_	Though the "Brown v. Board of Education" decision was finalized in 1954, southern states were extremely resistant to the decision that they must integrate for the six following years.
_	Real and Chance came to judge all the teams' performances, and Real and Chance made the decision that Baker's team wins the challenge.
_	During the tournament, James made the decision that it would be her last.
_	The Royal College of Midwives staged its first ever strike on 13 October 2014 in protest against the decision that only NHS staff at the top of their pay band would receive a 1% pay increase, while the remaining 55% of the workforce would only get annual incremental rises.
_	Low pre-sales and long lead times gave him less revenue, so he made the decision that it was unprofitable to continue work on the title.
_	In a statement explaining the change, CVS President & CEO Larry J. Merlo said, "We came to the decision that cigarettes and providing health care just don’t go together in the same setting."
_	Justice William J. Brennan, Jr. wrote in the decision that "if there is a bedrock principle underlying the First Amendment, it is that government may not prohibit the expression of an idea simply because society finds the idea offensive or disagreeable."
_	Ivan, a big time baseball fan, wanted to play baseball in high school and beyond, but it was his father who saw the scholarship opportunity in fencing and convinced his son to make the decision that would benefit him in the long run.
_	C. P. Ramaswami Aiyer said of the decision that:
_	Leonard J. Savage argued that using non-Bayesian methods such as minimax, the loss function should be based on the idea of "regret", i.e., the loss associated with a decision should be the difference between the consequences of the best decision that could have been made had the underlying circumstances been known and the decision that was in fact taken before they were known.
_	"I found the early hours really hard and it's affected my health and despite their desire for me to stay I've made the decision that it's just not good for my health," she said.
_	One of the jurymen ... informed me after the decision that that was the verdict that they had arranged two months previously."
_	However, in 2006 the RNLI made the decision that the event was "inappropriate" after a complaint was made that it was 'disrespecting fish'.
_	Some decisions are difficult because of the need to take into account how other people in the situation will respond to the decision that is taken.
_	In 1986, Hartford Friends Meeting in Connecticut, U.S., reached the decision that "the Meeting recognised a committed union in a celebration of marriage, under the care of the Meeting.
_	In June we had reached the decision that it was not possible to achieve our objectives with Castro in power and had agreed to undertake the program referred to by Undersecretary of State Livingston T. Merchant.
_	In 1920, the Government of India took the decision that the IFS Probationers may be trained at one centre and consequent to the establishment of Forest Research Institute at Dehradun, the training started in India in 1926.
_	The park was embroiled in a political controversy over its nomenclature, when the Bharatiya Janata Party state government revoked the decision that it be called the Rajiv Gandhi National Park.
_	At about 18.00 hours Gort took the decision that 5th Division, which was to have participated in the attack southwards, should instead go north in order to defend the Ypres-Comines Canal running between those two towns.
_	Rather than reboot the franchise a second time, they chose to focus primarily on continuing the mythology of the first two films when developing the story, with Danny McBride stating, "We all came to the decision that remaking something that already works isn't a good idea.
_	After Amelia received injury taking part in the shoot and she called an ambulance, Olivia became scared and could not do the jump, resulting in the decision that she should not take part in the shoot.
_	They took the decision that if and when they were to regroup, they would move on completely from their previous material.
_	In December 1944, the Joint Chiefs of Staff made the decision that Operation Matterhorn would be phased out, and the B-29s would be moved to newly captured bases in the Marianas in the central Pacific.
_	I made the decision that whatever I drove I would do it to the best of my ability and see where it led."
_	Supreme Court Justice Thomas Alito, a former federal prosecutor, lambasted Marian T. Ryan's office in the United States Supreme Court decision reversing the conviction of the woman, stating in the decision that "[a] State's most basic responsibility is to keep its people safe.
_	Mellon and Lovo made the decision that Job Order Contracts were to be procured using a Best Value solicitation.
_	By the late 1990s and with a change of record-label, the band was again at a peak of popularity, but other circumstances, notably the grave illness of Joan Cardona, led to the decision that the group would retire at the end of 2001.
_	Trust refused to withdraw its application before accountability hearing is completed, as a challenge to the decision that ICANN Board adopted at the Beijing GAC advice and denial of any reconsideration on the treatment of DCA's application.
_	He spent a year skiing in Whistler and came to the decision that BC was his home.
_	Ultimately, the strain of travelling between continents has taken its toll and Gareth made the decision that it would be in the best interests of himself, his family and Funeral to leave the band.
_	Finally the decision that was taken was to start from the Peloponnese (Morea), and the Danubian Principalities at the same time.
_	However, it is at Rye that George makes the decision that it to change his life.
_	Upon launch of the three regional news services in 1993, Meridian made the decision that all three programmes would share the same titles, music and name.
_	In 2010 British Government and its development partners made the decision that Ghana should become fully self-sufficient and do without outside help by 2020.
_	"In the decision that made the game a tie the referee was backed up by Umpire Taylor of Birmingham who, although a Just official has always been regarded by many as a friend of Auburn."
_	After lengthy meetings the Notre Dame administration made the decision that they will not go to a bowl game following the 2009 season.
_	The losing party in the 5–4 decision sought reargument on the ground that Black should have been disqualified; Black declined to recuse himself and the decision stood, but Justice Robert H. Jackson wrote a short opinion suggesting that the decision that Black should sit in the case was Black's alone and the Court did not endorse it.
_	West is jailed for four years for assorted criminal acts, his wife Cheryl makes the decision that the family will get honest employment, instead of continuing their life of crime.
_	The CRTC also noted that "The applicant cited an agreement to function as an emergency broadcaster in support of its application" but that this agreement is contrary to Broadcasting Order 2009-340 and Broadcasting Decision 2011-438 and re-iterated in the decision that it is “inappropriate for any given broadcaster to act as the designated emergency broadcaster”.
_	It is also stated in the decision that it did not violate the 14th Amendment.
_	The decree of Ukrainian parliament Presidium was signed on March 11, 1944 and legalized the decision that was adopted by the Stavka of Commander-in-Chief and the State Defense Committee (both headed by Stalin).
_	In May 2008, a robust debate in the House of Commons of the United Kingdom on the ethics of creating chimeras with human stem cells led to the decision that embryos would be allowed to be made in laboratories, given that they would be destroyed within the first 14 days.
_	Parliament came to the decision that Allomere would go to the canyonlands to verify the truth of Soren's claim.
_	They show that the core notion that adversarial litigation will lead to the truth is true if the parties are symmetrically informed and both have access to verifiable evidence that demonstrates the truth and so long as one of the parties prefers the decision that even a naive decisionmaker (who chooses from a set of decisions suggested by the parties) will reach under full information to the alternative under partial information.
_	"Patrick then (quoting St. Matthew 10:20) blessed his mouth and the grace of the Holy Ghost alighted on his utterance", and he pronounced, in a short poem which is preserved in the "Senchus Mor", the decision that "Nuadu should be put to death for his crime, but his soul should be pardoned and sent to heaven".
_	It has been on the basis of the decision that many states have abandoned the requirement for grand juries, usually replacing them with informations and a preliminary hearing before a judge or the discretion of the prosecutor.
_	Some decisions, such as the decision that a new version should be released, are finalized by a vote amongst the Habari committers.
_	The FFF president Jean-Pierre Escalettes hoped the announcement would mark the end of the incident, stating of the decision that is "not astonishing, it is logical".
_	During the 1970-71 forensics season, Dr. Hawkins made the decision that, despite the lack of support from the debate community, the increased interest in IEs justified the establishment of a national championship tournament.
_	In effect, it left in place the decision that the House had the standing to bring the suit, but would prevent it from being binding in future such cases, and eliminated the injunction that prohibited the cost-sharing reduction payments so that a future administration could theoretically resume the payments.
_	He went off to his cave near Pietermaritzburg and pondered, finally coming to the decision that deliverance of these young men was necessary.
_	Several prominent Progressive Conservatives backed away from the issue with Finance Minister Blaine Higgs demurring "it's certainly incumbent on me, and it's incumbent on my colleagues, to respect the decision that the premier makes," and PC candidate Hugh John "Ted" Flemming III stating "I wasn't there."
_	As a result, a 25–20 vote upheld the decision that Iceland should participate only as an observer.
_	This was due to the decision that the original person who sentenced the doctor was not authorised to hear the case.
_	As well as learning the layout of the village and refining battle technique, the rehearsals allowed the soldiers to acclimatise to the tropical heat, and led commanders to the decision that the paras would go into battle with minimal equipment to reduce the risk of heat exhaustion—excluding weapons and ammunition, they would carry only water and field dressings.
_	In addition to this, Margaret Mountford's departure from the role of an adviser in "The Apprentice", led to Sugar appointing Karren Brady as her replacement, with the decision that she would make her debut in the spin-off.
_	I do appreciate the decision that the people have made where they are recommending to government to see the ferry fees removed.
_	This meant that the decision that had been taken in 1974 to make Lensbury a members club without direct Shell involvement was reversed and all the members committees were abolished.
_	Goldberg said of the decision that "I regret that the Bolivian government took this decision.
_	Rather than land at Long Beach Airport, the pilot-in-command made the decision that the aircraft would land at Los Angeles International Airport (LAX), in order to take advantage of its long, wide runways and modern safety equipment.
_	Consultation with the Department of Planning resulted in the decision that the draft plan could not proceed.
_	The Attorney-General appealed to the High Court against the decision that the trust for the residue in clause 5 was void, whilst Doris Leahy and the 7 children appealed against the decision that bequest to an order of nuns or the Christian Brothers in clause 3 was valid.
_	On 26 August, in a 9 to 8 vote, the Supreme Court confirmed the decision that Pinochet should lose his senatorial immunity from prosecution.
_	In the case of the marriage of Prince Charles to Camilla Parker Bowles, in 2005, the matter was settled by the decision that Camilla, whilst entitled to the title Princess of Wales, would only use her secondary title of Duchess of Cornwall, out of respect to public sensibilities, and to her predecessor, Diana, Princess of Wales.
_	Britton took the decision that would cause Tom Finney to play some of the best football of his life.
_	But they made the decision that this was an acceptable compromise -- a tradeoff, if you will -- for the consumer protections.
_	A spokesperson for the CPS said that the prosecution was unable to provide sufficient evidence to contradict this new evidence and therefore took the decision that there was no longer a realistic prospect of conviction.
_	If these comments were, indeed, spoken by Mr. Pelini, we are extremely disappointed, but it only reaffirms the decision that he should no longer be a leader of young men at Nebraska.
_	These aims led to a controversy in 2005, when Seshu made the decision that SANGRAM would not support a United States government policy, the Anti-prostitution pledge.
_	Seeing how similar the two are, Martinez tries to apologize for Eliza’s sudden outburst when Kagenobu proclaims he has heard enough and has come to the decision that Eliza will be allowed into the school, on probationary terms, which blinds and shocks Sasaki.
_	'We made the decision that everyone at the meeting was a member,' Pennington remembers.
_	In December 1944, the Joint Chiefs of Staff made the decision that Operation Matterhorn would be phased out, and the 58th Bombardment Wing's B-29s would be moved to newly captured bases in the Marianas in the central Pacific.
_	In his press conference he said, "At this point, I earnestly believe that I have accomplished all that I am able to do,” McLay added, “I've made the decision that I'm going to be stepping aside to pursue other opportunities.”
_	In December 1944, the Joint Chiefs of Staff made the decision that the 58th Bombardment Wing's B-29s would be moved to newly captured bases in the Marianas in the central Pacific.
_	She came to the decision that the folktale was about the "fear of change", as two women, Snow White and her stepmother, came to adjust with the changes that they were facing in life.
_	Daryl Harper, standing at the bowler's end gave the decision that the wicket had been taken, but while walking off the field, Pietersen saw a replay on the big screen and questioned the validity of the decision.
_	Dicks later said of the decision that it was not original but it was the "only one available".
_	The personnel involved in the production of "Film for Discussion", "Woman's Day 20Cent"s and "Home" made the decision that no individual credits would appear on any of the three films.
_	As a veteran, Henry was interested in the decision that the Mississippi legislature had exempted returning veterans from paying the poll tax.
_	Planning for "Bodyguard" began even before Operation Cockade was fully under way, following the decision that Normandy would be the site of the coming invasion.
_	When he saw Disney's 1963 film "The Sword in the Stone", he finally made the decision that he should become an animator.
_	With McLaren's involvement broadening the band's prospects, Jones decided it was safer to make his move, and Nightingale was informed of the decision that he was out of the act upon his arrival for a rehearsal, when on walking in he found Jones wielding a guitar.
_	However, the subsequent discovery that the BR standard class 3s were fitted with 17-spoke wheels of the same diameter has led to the decision that these will not be used.
_	After consulting with Lopsang he made the decision that they could not be saved by the hypoxic survivors at Camp IV nor evacuated in time, he left them for nature to take its course, which the other survivors soon agreed was the only choice.
_	The Attorney General of New York sought review of both decisions: the decision that Newsome had not waived his right to file a federal habeas corpus petition by pleading guilty and also the decision that New York's loitering statute was unconstitutional.
_	If, however, he wants to say that the German state, through the mouth of its "Führer", unambiguously and publicly announced the decision that even Jewish women, children and infants were to be killed, than he has illustrated with one short phrase all that does not have to demonstrated in the current intellectual climate, but can be “imputed”.
_	In the Frazier camp, trainer Eddie Futch made the decision that the hordes of people and the tension in the steaming hot city were a poor environment to prepare in.
_	It was reported in January 2012, that Frankel made the decision that the third and final season of the series would be her last in order for her to concentrate on her business ventures.
_	The decision to upgrade the airport was taken in 1950, following the decision that Norway would receive the F-84 Thunderjet through the Marshall Plan.
_	On May 16, the defence filed a complaint at the Office of the Novgorod City Public Prosecutor, appealing against the decision that forbade Antonina to visit her daughter.
_	The comic starts off by depicting the attack in which Book was fatally wounded during the film "Serenity", then expands upon the character's life by flashing back to events in the character's life, then stepping back to the decision that led to each event, all the way to his childhood.
_	Among the articles for discussion was the decision that had been made to reduce the Status of Malacca and its head official.
_	The village court systems still exists but the court cases are heard in the village and the magistrate hands down the decision that suits the nature of the case.
_	For the Australians, the Japanese positions on the high ground signalled threat and their commander, Vasey, came to the decision that he would have to launch an offensive in order to capture this ground.
_	On 1 July, Shadow chancellor John McDonnell outlined Labour's vision for leaving the EU, saying that Britain had to respect the decision that was made in the referendum.
_	In 1630, King Gustavus II Adolphus announced the decision that Sweden should participate in the Thirty Years' War.
_	"We came to the decision that since we're Americans, there's no reason we have to play all Irish material.
_	In 1894, the Tuesday Evening Club, a spirited group of Salida townswomen, made the decision that the town of Salida needed a library.
_	Jaguar's board made the decision that subject to contractual agreement, TWR and JaguarSport would be responsible for the XJ220.
_	The Attorney General of Ontario sought leave to appeal the part of the decision that allowed the picking up and dropping of passengers in the province, whether the journey began or ended inside or outside the province.
_	During that time, Yates made the decision that the phone hacking needed no further investigation, despite "The Guardian" alleging that the previous investigation had been inadequate.
_	Cass agonises over this offer for two days, and comes to the decision that humanity must stand or fall on its own merits, without outside help or control.
_	Gaskarth said this was "a good situation" as it allowed them to "sit back and mull over a decision and make the decision that was absolutely, 100 percent what’s best for us."
_	“We made the decision that we are getting out of the rifle-making business,” says Jeff Still, Director of Accessories and Suppressors at Remington Outdoor Company.
_	A clear respond was sent to the Ottomans that the Latin-script would be the only one, "the alphabet of the Albanian people", and confirmed continuity of the decision that came out of the first congress of 1909.
_	That money, coupled with the decision that he would rather stay close to home without needing to constantly travel, led Rook to forgo any more professional basketball aspirations.
_	After a several-months-long hearing process, the Board of Inquiry in mid-2011 however came to the decision that a walkway and cycleway along the tunnel alignment was a required mitigation for open space loss in the areas around both tunnel portals (though not technically as transport mitigation), and that NZTA will have to pay for (though not build) the facility.
_	With the help of his advanced X-ray spectroscopy equipment he observed several previously unidentified X-ray spectral lines, and subsequently came to the decision that such lines are associated with new elements.
_	Cutcliffe, however, ultimately rebuffed Tennessee's overtures, remaining at Duke and stating, “After much thought and consideration, Karen and I reached the decision that Duke is the place for our family.
_	Moreover, further failed legal action meant Ashley was required to pay the legal costs of the SFA and Dave King following a failed bid to overturn the decision that King was a "fit and proper" person from April 2016.
_	And although those songs will see the light of day at some point, we collectively made the decision that we needed to take a new approach, and with Chi's condition heavy on our minds while doing so.
_	A dissenting opinion was entered by Judge Dyk agreeing with all decisions except the decision that a copyright law does not preempt a state contract.
_	Finally Bala reaches the decision that he will take neither side in the struggle, giving neither military support to Nahusha nor protection to Ashwara.
_	On 26 November 2007 the then Home Secretary Jacqui Smith made the decision that from December 2007, all PCSOs must be 18 before they can be appointed.
_	In September 2011, J. Russell Jackson described the Supreme Court's ruling in "Concepcion" as "the decision that has launched a thousand motions", as defendants sought to compel arbitration of cases that had been pending "for some time", especially in California.
_	"In my appeal against the decision that my fight with Danny Green was fixed and I took a dive (the decision) has been OVERTURNED in a court of law by three High Court judges."
_	Because of the overwhelming importance Kraepelin attached to finding the neuropathological basis of psychiatric disorders, Kraepelin made the decision that the disease would bear Alzheimer's name.
_	However, upon being offered colony status by SAI, NKE officers made the decision that the transition would involve the loss of sisters who did not meet certain music class requirements of SAI.
_	When Hornsby arrived, he essentially reversed the decision that Metts had made, in regards to the future of the county's magnet programs, and he decided to instead eliminate most of the school system's magnet programs, most of which had been identified as under-performing for several years.
_	Take the decision that a road in Fier bear the name Fatmir Agalliu In 2010 Tirana Municipal Council decided that a street in Tirana called Fatmir Agalliu.
_	After the decision that it is a draw, Dick and the priestess spend the night together.
_	John struggles to forgive Moira for her infidelity and Thornton said he makes the decision that their marriage is over and she has to go.
_	Although the government in Belgrade accepted the decision that Banat, Bačka and Baranja had joined Serbia, it did not recognize the People's Administration.
_	"The main problem with the sorcerer's-apprentice argument is that the decision that a sentence could be translated without analysis can only be made after the fact.
_	He is quoted as saying: "I made the decision that I didn't care if there was any money in the role or not.
_	The protagonist will play an important role in helping her make the decision that is best for everyone.
_	Technically speaking the additional protection afforded by the PECO became irrelevant because of the decision that the company was not insolvent.
_	It also led to the decision that there should be an all-Canada route for the Canadian Pacific Railway.
_	In December 1944, the Joint Chiefs of Staff made the decision that Operation Matterhorn would be phased out, and the 58th Bombardment Wing's B-29s would be moved to newly captured bases in the Marianas in the central Pacific.
_	Judge Schroeder also wrote in the decision that Arizona "did not meet its burden of showing that this residency requirement is narrowly tailored to further the state's compelling interest in preventing fraud."
_	But whoever is ultimately responsible for the decision that deemed my work with Pearl Jam as an effort that was not important enough to grant me induction knows nothing of what we accomplished, and I am personally at a loss for words for how Stone, Mike, Jeff, Matt, Edward and Kelly Curtis are accepting of such an injustice.
_	Wolfinger was criticized for making the decision that there was insufficient evidence for a conviction of George Zimmerman on the charge of manslaughter.
_	On the 29 July, the South African government made the decision that UNITA would carry out the assault on Cuito and not 32 Battalion who would again be relegated to escort and protection duties of the SADF support troops and artillery.
_	The band made the decision that the album would be mostly acoustic, so band member Slick Aguilar did not contribute on most of the songs included.
_	A long discussion and consultation on the new name concluded with the decision that the name would remain "Thomond Park".
_	In the American colony of the Philippines, the Main political dispute over independence was settled by 1934 with the decision that the Philippines would become independent in 1946.
_	In December 1944, the Joint Chiefs of Staff made the decision that the 58th Bombardment Wing's B-29s would be moved to the newly captured islands in the Marianas in the central Pacific with airfields built on them to support their operations.
_	The optimal decision rule, or the organism's best foraging strategy, is defined as the decision that maximizes the currency under the constraints of the environment.
_	Around the same time, Avalon Hill had made the decision that ASL did not have a future, and so MMP sought to keep it alive among fans by publishing occasional scenarios and a fanzine.
_	A further inspection led to the decision that the school required special measures.
_	In July 1963, a year after the revolt, Sultan Omar Ali Saifuddien III made the decision that Brunei was not to join Malaysia.
_	After much prayer and conversations with my family, I have made the decision that I will not serve as mayor for the 2015-2017 term and intend to submit a declination of such office at the city council meeting at which the election canvass will be conducted.
_	However, two weeks following the decision that the candidate will be selected at a convention instead of a primary,
_	Cutcliffe, however, ultimately rebuffed Tennessee's overtures, remaining at Duke and stating, “After much thought and consideration, Karen and I reached the decision that Duke is the place for our family.
_	De Backer remarked in 2003 that based on Schroeder's writing of this song, the pair made the decision that they would continue in this musical style.
_	Before its standalone version was announced in June 2017, many criticized the decision that "Modern Warfare Remastered" would only be available through purchasing a premium version of "Infinite Warfare".
_	Rudolf appealed against this ruling, and in early 2006 the US Federal Court in Atlanta found that his application was not "frivolous", but upheld the decision that it had no merit.
_	Once a case is decided the Court will publish written reasons for the decision that consist of one or more reasons from any number of the nine justices.
_	Parker's family were so concerned about the decision that they wrote a letter of complaint to the Home Secretary, David Blunkett.
_	Faced with continuing losses, the promoters took the decision that they needed a major headlining act to boost ticket sales.
_	Argentina had a history of turning down extradition requests for Nazi criminals, so Israeli Prime Minister David Ben-Gurion made the decision that Eichmann should be captured rather than extradited, and brought to Israel for trial.
_	Both Revie and the Leeds fans were so enraged at the decision that they invaded the pitch to protest, and consequently the FA banned Leeds from playing their first five home games of the following season at home.
_	At the Agragrian Association's congress in Kristiansand in 1920, he played an important role in the process that led to the decision that the organization should nominate its own list in the Norwegian parliamentary election, 1921, leading to the establishment of the Farmer's Party.
_	One result of this was the decision that Queen's College, Dundee, a part of the University of St. Andrews should become a university in its own right.
_	"In view of the decision that cricket is to go forward, both the coach and the captain have been asked to work out a mutual and professional working relationship.
_	This dramatic gesture was made without reference to the King or Van Overstraeten and without knowing the decision that had been taken to keep Germany in the dark about whether Belgium was in possession of its attack plans.
_	In January 2012 OLAF concluded the investigation with the decision that there was "no infringement" on Thaler's side.
_	After the case was tried, the Supreme Court came to the decision that the Fort Belknap reservation had reserved water rights through the 1888 agreement which had created the American Indian Reservation in the first place.
_	In September 2011, Russian governmental authorities have approved the decision that since this date all newly built terrestrial digital TV networks will use the DVB-T2 standard.
_	"They'd made the decision that they were not magazine publishers", said Kramer.
_	What was the law of the Church at the time (6 January 2009) the Presbytery of Aberdeen made the decision that has been challenged; and was the Presbytery entitled to make the decision it made in the light of the legal position at that time?
_	This contributed to the decision that Tadzio and his family and friends would be portrayed by non-speaking dancers.
_	In December 1944, the Joint Chiefs of Staff made the decision that Operation Matterhorn would be phased out, and the B-29s would be moved to newly captured bases in the Marianas in the central Pacific.
_	He said of his decision to house Assange: "Having watched him give himself up last week to the British justice system, I took the decision that I would do whatever else it took to ensure that he is not denied his basic rights as a result of the anger of the powerful forces he has enraged."
_	That’s when she gained her immense passion for singing and song writing and made the decision that she wanted to be a performer.
_	In December 2009 the Turku City Council made the decision that a light rail system (, "fast tramway") system would be realised in the city after an intermediate phase of bus rapid transit.
_	Bennett is celebrated for having provoked the decision that the doctrine of the Real Presence is a dogma not inconsistent with the creed of the Church of England.
_	It was subsequently decided to halve this, based on the decision that the ability to destroy twenty Soviet cities would have nearly as great a deterrent effect as the ability to destroy forty.
_	In April 2013, a French Wikipedia article about her was deleted after a debate resulted in the decision that she lacked encyclopedic interest, being merely the object of a "buzz" instead of proper "information"; this decision on the French-language Wikipedia generated some media attention
_	"Considering it is important to stop the progression of player-café owners, the executive Committee takes the decision that at this day, except for a player whose parents ran the café for more than 5 years, the authorisation to open a café will be subordinated to the condition that the player will not be a part of the first team."
_	However, HP also made the decision that the Palm Pre, Palm Pixi, and the "Plus" revisions would not receive over-the-air updates to webOS 2.0, despite a previous commitment to an upgrade "in coming months."
_	However, the release of "Falling" as a single was the decision that subsequently ended their British musical career.
_	Radke has made the decision that it's important to be home with his newborn this summer.
_	Without such an order, and not knowing of Goodman's approval, Cline made the decision that "Heidi" would start on time.
_	Another reason the surplus works was the decision that all the sculptures of the square were made in bronze except those of the upper terrace, which are stone-, with the result that some works that had already been executed in stone had to be repeated, and the remaining were relocated: it is Lerida, Manuel Fuxà, and Tarragona, Jaume Otero, that were installed on Diagonal avenue, opposite the Royal Palace of Pedralbes.
_	After hearing the stories of past Shadowhawks, Eddie Collins makes the decision that now he is going to be ShadowHawk on his terms and receives a new costume.
_	"It was certainly difficult for us to come to the decision that if we were going to be economically viable we had to move", club President Larry Breskin said.
_	Chesarek, aware that a British soldier, Colour Sergeant Ian Page, had been critically injured with a gunshot wound to the head, then made the decision that as the only helicopter in the area he would conduct a medical evacuation with the Lynx despite his version of the aircraft type not being designed for this use.
_	In 1989 and 1990 the RAAF's UH-1H Iroquois were subsequently transferred to the 171st Aviation Squadron in Darwin, Northern Territory and the 5th Aviation Regiment based in Townsville, Queensland following the decision that all battlefield helicopters would be operated by the Australian Army.
_	Following the recommendations of an internal report, the new U.S. headquarters, the Military Assistance Command, Vietnam (MACV), made the decision that since news correspondents were "thoroughly knowledgeable" about the war, its the Joint United States Public Affairs Office (JUSPAO) would attempt to woo reporters by providing them with "up to date, factual information on current operations and policies."
_	In April 2014, South Norfolk MP Richard Bacon welcomed the decision that Pickles and the DCLG would have final say over the building of wind turbines.
_	In 2005, the Victorian Government made the decision that cattle grazing would be banned in the remaining area of the Alpine National Park; although allowing grazing in adjacent state forest areas.
_	On 27 November 1970 the Minister gave the decision that Leader House should not be demolished.
_	Both criticized the Fifth Circuit for having overruled "Wilko" before the Court itself did, reminding lower courts that only the Supreme Court could overrule itself, an aspect of the decision that has come in for some criticism.
_	Purdy's case ended on 30 August 2009 with the decision that the Director of Public Prosecutions had to clarify how the Suicide Act 1961 is to be enforced in England and Wales.
_	This decision effectively ended the case and let stand the decision that Smith's estate was not entitled to the money that had previously been awarded to her.
_	Through choosing the different options, the viewer is shown Eric's (often for comic effect) justifications behind the decision that the viewer has just made.
_	Rick Barry and play-by-play announcer Brent Musburger were quick to note on the telecast of the game that two seconds remained, but Powers made the decision that one second remained in the second overtime period after order was restored in the arena.
_	From this meeting came the decision that the NAWSA would aid the government by helping women prepare to take over jobs while men were away and would also aid the Red Cross.
_	The LVF leaders subsequently made the decision that Jameson would pay for the attack with his life.
_	Abandoning vaulting poles in the stadium, with no intention of ever competing again, Jenner stated that: "In 1972, I made the decision that I would go four years and totally dedicate myself to what I was doing, and then I would move on after it was over with.
_	The UNESCO General Conference took the decision that took effect on 17 November 1999, when it unanimously adopted a draft resolution submitted by Bangladesh and co-sponsored and supported by 28 other countries.
_	A major controversy that arose during Wilson's first government was the decision that the government could not fulfil its long-held promise to raise the school leaving age to 16, because of the investment required in infrastructure, such as extra classrooms and teachers.
_	The Supreme Court upheld the decision that Proposition 1 was constitutional.
_	I'm sure at some time he made the decision that isn't what he wanted to do."
_	However, she held that the Miranda Rights should be enough for the defendants to understand their right for counsel which lead to the decision that Davis’s request was ambiguous.
_	In October 2012, the owner of the VirusBuster has made the decision that the products and the services were going to be removed from the market.
_	After Browder v. Gayle, the decision that ended segregation on Montgomery buses, was upheld on November 13, ACMHR leaders petitioned the city to repeal the ordinances requiring segregated buses in Birmingham.
_	In the short-term, it refers to "the decision that one loves a certain other", and in the long-term, it refers to "one's commitment to maintain that love."
_	In the Pacific Region, instead of NORAD, the United States Pacific Command must make the decision that an incoming ballistic missile is a threat to the United States.
